Utah statutes.
31A-26-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless expressly provided otherwise:

(1)  "Company adjuster" means a person employed by an insurer whose regular duties include insurance adjusting.

(2)  "Independent adjuster" means an insurance adjuster required to be licensed under Section 31A-26-201, who engages in insurance adjusting as a representative of insurers.

(3)  "Insurance adjusting" or "adjusting" means directing the investigation, negotiation, or settlement of a claim under an insurance policy, on behalf of an insurer, policyholder, or a claimant under an insurance policy.

(4)  "Organization" means a person other than a natural person, and includes a sole proprietorship by which a natural person does business under an assumed name.

(5)  "Portable electronics insurance" is as defined in Section 31A-22-1802.

(6)  "Public adjuster" means a person required to be licensed under Section 31A-26-201, who engages in insurance adjusting as a representative of insureds and claimants under insurance policies.



Amended by Chapter 151, 2012 General Session

